Maryland, session 2025, HB0830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0830*

HOUSE BILL 830
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR:
(1) GENETIC TESTING TO IDENTIFY WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A
PERSONAL OR FAMILY HISTORY OF CANCER HAS AN INHERITED MUTATION
ASSOCIATED WITH AN INCREASED RISK OF CANCER IF THE GENETIC TESTING IS:
(I) RECOMMENDED BY A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL; AND
(II) CONSISTENT WITH EVIDENCE–BASED, CLINICAL PRACTICE
GUIDELINES; AND
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO UNDERGOES GENETIC TESTING FOR
WHICH COVERAGE IS PROVIDED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
DETERMINED TO BE AT AN INCREASED RISK OF DEVELOPING CANCER, FOLLOW–UP
EVIDENCE–BASED CANCER IMAGING THAT:
(I) IS RECOMMENDED FOR THE TYPE OF CANCER IDENTIFIED
BY THE GENETIC TESTING; AND
(II) USES MODALITIES ESTABLISHED IN THE MOST RECENT
VERSION OF THE NATIONAL COMPREHENSIVE CANCER NETWORK CLINICAL
PRACTICE GUIDELINES IN ONCOLOGY.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON COVERAGE FOR GENETIC
TESTING OR FOLLOW–UP EVIDENCE–BASED CANCER IMAGING AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 830 3
(2) (I) IF THE APPLICATION OF THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WOULD RESULT IN HEALTH SAVINGS
ACCOUNT INELIGIBILITY UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223, THE REQUIREMENT SHALL APPLY
TO THE HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT–QUALIFIED HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLANS
WITH RESPECT TO THE DEDUCTIBLE OF THE PLAN AFTER THE BENEFICIARY
SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223.
(II) FOR ITEMS OR SERVICES THAT ARE PREVENTIVE CARE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH 26 U.S.C. § 223(C)(2)(C), THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE BENEFICIARY STATUS
SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.